Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201412-101
Wyuka Cemetery;
declared a public charitable corporation; powers; trustees; appointment; terms;
vacancies; reports; retirement plan reports; duties.

(1)
The cemetery in Lincoln, Nebraska, known as Wyuka Cemetery, is hereby declared
to be a public charitable corporation. The general control and management
of the affairs of such cemetery shall be vested in a board of three trustees
until July 1, 2009, and thereafter shall be vested in a board of five trustees.
The trustees shall serve without compensation and shall be a body corporate
to be known as Wyuka Cemetery, with power to sue and be sued, to contract
and to be contracted with, and to acquire, hold, and convey both real and
personal property for all purposes consistent with the provisions of sections
12-101 to 12-105, and shall have the power of eminent domain to be exercised
in the manner provided in section 12-201.

(2) The trustees of Wyuka Cemetery shall have the power, by
resolution duly adopted by a majority vote, to authorize one of their number
to sign a petition for paving, repaving, curbing, recurbing, grading, changing
grading, guttering, resurfacing, relaying existing pavement, or otherwise
improving any street, streets, alley, alleys, or public ways or grounds abutting
cemetery property. When such improvements have been ordered, the trustees
shall pay, from funds of the cemetery, such special taxes or assessments as
may be properly determined.

(3) The trustees of Wyuka Cemetery shall be appointed by the
Governor of the State of Nebraska at the expiration of each trustee's term
of office. The two trustees appointed for their initial terms of office beginning
July 1, 2009, shall be appointed by the Governor to serve a five-year term
and a six-year term, respectively. Thereafter, each of the five trustees shall
be appointed by the Governor for a term of six years. In the event of a vacancy
occurring among the members of the board, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment
by the Governor, and such appointment shall continue for the unexpired term.

(4) The board of trustees of Wyuka Cemetery shall file with
the Auditor of Public Accounts, on or before the second Tuesday in June of
each year, an itemized report of all the receipts and expenditures in connection
with its management and control of the cemetery.

(5) The trustees of Wyuka Cemetery shall have the power to
provide, in their discretion, retirement benefits for present and future employees
of the cemetery, and to establish, participate in, and administer plans for
the benefit of its employees or its employees and their dependents, which
may provide disability, hospitalization, medical, surgical, accident, sickness
and life insurance coverage, or any one or more coverages, and which shall
be purchased from a corporation or corporations authorized and licensed by
the Department of Insurance.

(6)(a) Beginning December 31, 1998, and each December 31 thereafter,
the trustees shall file with the Public Employees Retirement Board an annual
report on each retirement plan established pursuant to this section and section
401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code and shall submit copies of such report
to the Auditor of Public Accounts. The Auditor of Public Accounts may prepare
a review of such report pursuant to section 84-304.02 but is not required
to do so. The annual report shall be in a form prescribed by the Public Employees
Retirement Board and shall contain the following information for each such
retirement plan:

(i) The number of persons participating in the retirement
plan;

(ii) The contribution rates of participants in the plan;

(iii) Plan assets and liabilities;

(iv) The names and positions of persons administering the
plan;

(v) The names and positions of persons investing plan assets;

(vi) The form and nature of investments;

(vii) For each defined contribution plan, a full description
of investment policies and options available to plan participants; and

(viii) For each defined benefit plan, the levels of benefits
of participants in the plan, the number of members who are eligible for a
benefit, and the total present value of such members' benefits, as well as
the funding sources which will pay for such benefits.

If a plan contains no current active participants, the trustees
may file in place of such report a statement with the Public Employees Retirement
Board indicating the number of retirees still drawing benefits, and the sources
and amount of funding for such benefits.

(b) If such retirement plan is
a defined benefit plan which
was open to new members on January 1, 2004, in addition to the reports required by section 13-2402, the
trustees shall cause to be prepared an
annual report and shall file the same with the Public Employees
Retirement Board and the Nebraska
Retirement Systems Committee of the Legislature and submit to
the Auditor of Public Accounts a copy of such report. The Auditor of Public
Accounts may prepare a review of such report pursuant to section 84-304.02
but is not required to do so. If
the trustees do not submit a copy of the report to the Auditor of Public Accounts
within six months after the end of the plan year, the Auditor of Public Accounts
may audit, or cause to be audited, Wyuka Cemetery. All costs of the audit
shall be paid by Wyuka Cemetery. The report shall consist of a
full actuarial analysis of each such retirement plan established pursuant
to this section. The analysis shall be prepared by an independent private
organization or public entity employing actuaries who are members in good
standing of the American Academy of Actuaries, and which organization or entity
has demonstrated expertise to perform this type of analysis and is unrelated
to any organization offering investment advice or which provides investment
management services to the retirement plan. The
report to the Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 1927, c. 197, § 1, p. 560;

C.S.1929, § 13-101;

R.S.1943, § 12-101;

Laws 1953, c. 15, § 1, p. 81;

Laws 1959, c. 28, § 1, p. 179;

Laws 1967, c. 38, § 1, p. 167;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 795, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB498, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB252, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB474, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB759, § 3.
July 18, 2014
This section authorizes Wyuka Cemetery to sell personal property so closely connected to its cemetery operation as grave markers and monuments. Speidell Monuments v. Wyuka Cemetery, 242 Neb. 134, 493 N.W.2d 336 (1992).

Wyuka Cemetery is a body politic and corporate, and legacy to it is subject to inheritance tax. In re Estate of Rudge, 114 Neb. 335, 207 N.W. 520 (1926).